District of Columbia statutes.
14-507

Other methods of proof.

This chapter does not prevent the proof of records or other documents by any method authorized by other laws or rules of court.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 521, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 14-507.
1973 Ed., § 14-507.